District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Risk-Based Third-Party Code Review Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986, effective March
21, 1987 (D.C. Law 6-216; D.C. Official Code § 6–1405.02), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) The Mayor shall allow qualified third-party plan reviewers to review
construction documents, or components of construction documents, and certify their compliance
with the Construction Codes or Zoning Regulations. For a qualifying project, a certification
issued by a qualified third-party plan reviewer pursuant to this section shall be binding upon the
Department of Buildings unless the Director or their delegee identifies a specific defect or issue
requiring additional Department review within the review period.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended by adding new paragraphs (3) and (4) to read as
follows:
“(3) The rules set the criteria for determining whether a project qualifies for

binding third-party review, shall include criteria based on project size, occupancy, structural
complexity, construction type, height, number of dwelling units, fire and life-safety
characteristics, site conditions, historic status, and other characteristics relevant to project risk;”
“(4) The rules set the review period within which the Department may identify a
specific defect or issue requiring additional Department review of a project subject to third-party
binding review.”
(c) A new subsection (j) is added to read as follows:
“(j)(1) A project shall qualify for binding third-party review if the project meets
the eligibility criteria established by the Mayor and the construction documents have been
reviewed and certified by a qualified third-party plan reviewer.
“(2) The Department may require additional review of a project if, within the
review period established pursuant to subsection (b)(4), the Director identifies:
“(A) A specific defect in the construction documents;
“(B) A material failure to comply with the Construction Codes or Zoning
Regulations; or
“(C) A project-specific circumstance that requires additional Department
review pursuant to criteria established by rule.
“(3) If the Director does not identify a matter described in paragraph (2) of this
subsection within the applicable review period, the third-party certification shall be deemed
accepted by the Department and shall satisfy the Department's plan-review requirement for the
construction documents or components of construction documents covered by the certification.
“(4) Nothing in this subsection shall limit the Department's authority to conduct
inspections or take enforcement action authorized by law after a permit is issued.”.

Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.